Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.434

Notice of hearing.

(1) The agency or the office of administrative hearings shall set the time and place of the hearing and give not less than seven days advance written notice to all parties and to all persons who have filed written petitions to intervene in the matter.

(2) The notice shall include:

(a) Unless otherwise ordered by the presiding officer, the names and mailing addresses of all parties to whom notice is being given and, if known, the names and addresses of their representatives;

(b) If the agency intends to appear, the mailing address and telephone number of the office designated to represent the agency in the proceeding;

(c) The official file or other reference number and the name of the proceeding;

(d) The name, official title, mailing address, and telephone number of the presiding officer, if known;

(e) A statement of the time, place and nature of the proceeding;

(f) A statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held;

(g) A reference to the particular sections of the statutes and rules involved;

(h) A short and plain statement of the matters asserted by the agency; and

(i) A statement that a party who fails to attend or participate in a hearing or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding may be held in default in accordance with this chapter.

(3) If the agency is unable to state the matters required by subsection (2)(h) of this section at the time the notice is served, the initial notice may be limited to a statement of the issues involved. If the proceeding is initiated by a person other than the agency, the initial notice may be limited to the inclusion of a copy of the initiating document. Thereafter, upon request, a more definite and detailed statement shall be furnished.

(4) The notice may include any other matters considered desirable by the agency.

(5) The notice may be served on a party via electronic distribution, with a party's agreement.

[ 2013 c 110 s 1; 1988 c 288 s 409; 1980 c 31 s 1; 1967 c 237 s 9; 1959 c 234 s 9. Formerly RCW 34.04.090.]